Hawaii statutes.
§441-6 When dedication complete; effect of
dedication. Upon the recordation or filing of a map or plat and
certificate of dedication pursuant to sections 441-2 and 441-3, the dedication
is complete with respect to all property or parts thereof which are described
or depicted in or on both the certificate of dedication and map or plat for all
purposes and thereafter the property shall be occupied and used exclusively for
cemetery purposes. [L 1967, c 199, pt of §1; HRS §441-6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next